test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-aig41_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - aig: # Noun (41) aig 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     aig+N+Sg+Nom: aig
     aig+N+Sg+Gen: ao
     aig+N+Sg+Par: aigo
     aig+N+Sg+Ill: aigo
     aig+N+Sg+Ine: [aon, aoh, aohn]
     aig+N+Sg+Ela: aost
     aig+N+Sg+All: aolõ
     aig+N+Sg+Ade: aol
     aig+N+Sg+Abl: aolt
     aig+N+Sg+Tra: aos
     aig+N+Sg+Ter: aoniq
     aig+N+Sg+Abe: aoldaq
     aig+N+Sg+Com: aogaq
     aig+N+Pl+Nom: aoq
     aig+N+Pl+Gen: aigõ
     aig+N+Pl+Par: aigõ
     aig+N+Pl+Ill: [aigõhe, aigõ, aigõdõ]
     aig+N+Pl+Ine: [aen, aeh, aehn]
     aig+N+Pl+Ela: aest
     aig+N+Pl+All: aelõ
     aig+N+Pl+Ade: ael
     aig+N+Pl+Abl: aelt
     aig+N+Pl+Tra: aes
     aig+N+Pl+Ter: aeniq
     aig+N+Pl+Abe: aeldaq
     aig+N+Pl+Com: aigõgaq
